Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2657
Nebraska aerial pesticide business
license; reports and notice required.

Prior to commencing aerial spraying operations, a person
holding a Nebraska aerial pesticide business license shall immediately report
all aircraft, pilots, and departure locations utilized for the operation if
different from or in addition to the information provided in the person's
initial or renewal license application. If a pilot or aircraft is to be utilized
for seasonal operations or on a temporary basis, the license holder shall
notify the director of the approximate dates of commencement and termination
of the utilization of supplemental pilots or aircraft.

Laws 2010, LB254, § 4.